Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4618
Selective allocation doctrine.

If a powerholder exercises a power of appointment in a disposition that also disposes of property the powerholder owns, the owned property and the appointive property must be allocated in the permissible manner that best carries out the powerholder's intent.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 41.